Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act:

(1) Allocation year means the year for which the authority awards Nebraska affordable housing tax credits pursuant to the act;

(2) Authority means the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority;

(3) Eligibility statement means a statement authorized and issued by the authority certifying that a given project is a qualified project that qualifies for Nebraska affordable housing tax credits;

(4) Federal low-income housing tax credit means the federal tax credit provided in section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(5) Nebraska affordable housing tax credit means the nonrefundable tax credit authorized in section 77-2503;

(6) Pass-through entity means (a) a partnership, (b) a limited liability company, or (c) a corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(7) Qualified project means a qualified low-income building or buildings, as that term is defined in section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and

(8) Taxpayer means a person, firm, corporation, or other business entity subject to the income tax imposed by section 77-2715 or 77-2734.02, an insurance company subject to premium and related retaliatory tax liability imposed by section 44-150, 77-908, or 81-523, a financial institution subject to the franchise tax imposed by sections 77-3801 to 77-3807, or a nonprofit corporation of the type listed in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(4).

Laws 2016, LB884, § 12;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 339;

Laws 2025, LB182, § 2.